Louisiana, session 2026, HB9.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 49:170.26 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
6 §170.26. Stuffed Shrimp Capital of Louisiana; Shreveport
7 Shreveport is hereby designated as the "Stuffed Shrimp Capital of Louisiana".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.